Massachusetts, session 194th, H5339.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the 
licensing authority of the town of Ashland may grant 10 additional licenses for the sale of all 
alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138 to 
establishments located within the 3 development zones described in subsection (b) upon approval 
of and under conditions set by the licensing authority of the town of Ashland.  A license granted 
under this act shall be clearly marked on its face either “Downtown Redevelopment”, “Rt. 126 
Redevelopment”, or “MBTA Zone”, as applicable, and shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 
except said section 17. 
(b)  The licensing authority shall restrict the 10 licenses authorized in this act as follows: 
(1) Three licenses shall be issued to establishments located within the town’s “Downtown 
Redevelopment” district as shown on a map entitled “House No. 425, Town of Ashland 
Additional Liquor License Request” dated March 23, 2026, a copy of which is on file in the 
office of the town clerk; 

of 3 14  (2) Three licenses shall be issued to establishments located within the town’s “Rt. 126 
Redevelopment” district as shown on a map entitled “House No. 425, Town of Ashland 
Additional Liquor License Request” dated March 23, 2026, a copy of which is on file in the 
office of the town clerk; and 
(3) Four licenses shall be issued to establishments located within the town’s “MBTA 
Zone” district as shown on a map entitled “House No. 425, Town of Ashland Additional Liquor 
License Request” dated March 23, 2026, a copy of which is on file in the office of the town 
clerk.  
(c) A license granted pursuant to this section shall only be exercised in the dining room of 
a common victualler and in such other public rooms or areas as may be deemed reasonable and 
appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in writing. 
(d) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted pursuant to 
this act to a location outside of the initial zoned areas as described in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) of 
subsection (b), but it may grant a license to a new applicant within such initial zoned area if the 
applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a letter 
from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good standing 
with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been paid. 
(e)  If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this act or any such 
license granted under this act is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, the license shall be 
returned physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to 
the licensing authority and the licensing authority may then grant the license to a new applicant 
under the same conditions specified in this act.  

of 3 36  (f)  All licenses granted under this act shall be issued within 5 years after the effective 
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may 
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (d) or (e) thereafter.  
SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect upon its passage.